Massachusetts, session 194th, S1812.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 145 by inserting the following words after the word
"spouse":- "a registered domestic partner,".
SECTION 2. Said section, as so appearing, is hereby further amended in line 147 by
inserting the following words after the word "spouse":- "or a registered domestic partner".
of 1